District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.13

Special contingency reserve.

(a)

An excess of the total of § 1-622.12(a)(1) over the sum of § 1-622.12(a)(2) and (a)(3) shall be held by the company issuing the policy as a special contingency reserve to be used by the company only for charges under the policy purchased under § 1-622.05.

(b)

The special contingency reserve shall bear interest at a rate determined in advance of each policy period by the company from which the insurance was purchased under § 1-622.05 and approved by the Mayor as being consistent with the rates generally used by the company from which the insurance was purchased under § 1-622.05 for similar funds held under other group life insurance policies.

(c)

When the Mayor determines that the amount of the special contingency reserve is sufficient to provide for adverse fluctuations in future charges under the policy, any funds in excess of that amount may be used to increase benefits, to reduce premiums, or both, or may be deposited in the General Fund of the District.

(d)

When a policy purchased under § 1-622.05 is discontinued, any balance remaining in the special contingency reserve after all charges have been paid shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District.

(e)

When a policy purchased pursuant to § 1-622.05 is replaced by a successor policy, either by a new policy under a contract with the same life insurance company or by a policy under a new contract with another life insurance company, any balance remaining in the special contingency reserve shall be transferred to the special contingency reserve for the new policy.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2213
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-89, § 2, 45 DCR 1306
1981 Ed., § 1-623.13.
Application of 12-89: Section 4 of D.C. Law 12-89 provided that the provisions of § 2 of the act shall apply as of May 30, 1995.